Wyoming statutes. Title 14 Children
Article 1. Guardian Ad Litem Program

§ 14-12-101.
Office of guardian ad litem; guardian ad litem program; rulemaking; reporting.

The office of guardian ad litem shall administer a guardian ad litem program. The program shall employ or contract with, supervise and manage attorneys providing legal representation as guardians ad litem in the following cases and actions:

Child protection cases under W.S.

14-3-101

through

14-3-440

;

Children in need of supervision cases under W.S.

14-6-401

through

14-6-440

, to the extent an attorney has been appointed to serve only as a guardian ad litem;

Delinquency cases under W.S.

14-6-201

through

14-6-252

, to the extent an attorney has been appointed to serve only as a guardian ad litem;

Termination of parental rights actions under W.S.

14-2-308

through

14-2-319

, brought as a result of a child protection, child in need of supervision or delinquency action;

Interstate Compact on Juveniles proceedings under W.S.

14-6-102

, when requested by the juvenile or the court;

Appeals to the Wyoming supreme court in the cases or actions specified in this subsection.

Repealed by Laws 2020, ch. 122, § 3.

The office shall adopt policies and rules and regulations governing standards for the legal representation by attorneys acting as guardians ad litem in cases under the program and for the training of those attorneys. Any attorney providing services to the program as a guardian ad litem shall meet the standards established by the office for the program.

The office shall include within its biennial budget request submitted under W.S.

9-2-1013

a report of the reimbursement for legal representation of children by attorneys as guardians ad litem in child protection or children in need of supervision cases. The report shall include the number of cases and the amount of funds expended for reimbursements and the amounts of matching monies from participating counties under W.S.

14-12-103

for each of the two (2) immediately preceding fiscal years. The county attorney in any county not participating in the program shall submit a report containing the same information for the county to the joint appropriations interim committee by December 1 of each odd numbered year.

History.

Laws 2012, ch. 76, § 2; 2013 ch. 170, § 1, effective March 13, 2013; 2014 ch. 7, § 2, effective July 1, 2014; 2020 ch. 122, §§
2, 3, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2013 amendment,

added (a)(v), making a designation change.

Laws 2013, ch. 170, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 13, 2013.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, added (d).

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in the introductory language of (a) substituted “office of guardian ad litem” for “office of the state public defender”; repealed (b), which read “The program shall be administered by an administrator appointed by the state public defender. The administrator shall be an attorney in good standing with the Wyoming state bar with experience in guardian ad litem representation, child welfare and juvenile justice”; and in (c) deleted the second and third sentences, which read “The policies and rules shall ensure that the program will be separate and distinct from the office's performance of duties involving criminal defense and representation of a juvenile other than as a guardian ad litem in delinquency proceedings. To the maximum extent possible, the policies and rules shall ensure all fiscal and information technology duties for the program are kept separate from the fiscal and information technology duties for the office of the public defender.”

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2012, ch. 76, §§ 1, 4, provide: “Section 1. The guardian ad litem program initially authorized by 2005 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 237 and transferred to the state public defender's office pursuant to 2008 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 48, Section 316 is authorized and continued by this act and shall be administered as provided in this act.”

“Section 4. All funds previously appropriated to the state public defender's office for the guardian ad litem program or appropriated to that office for the program under 2012 Senate File 1 shall be deposited to the guardian ad litem account created by this act and may be expended as provided by this act.”

Laws 2020, ch. 122, § 4, provides: “(a) On the effective date of this act:

“(i) All unexpired contracts existing between the office of the state public defender and attorneys under W.S. 14-12-101(a) or 14-12-102(c) shall continue with the office of guardian ad litem substituted for the office of the state public defender;

“(ii) All unexpired agreements existing between the office of the state public defender and counties under W.S.

14-12-103

shall continue with the office of guardian ad litem substituted for the office of the state public defender;

“(iii) Any unexpired memorandum of understanding existing between the office of the state public defender and the department of family services shall continue with the office of guardian ad litem substituted for the office of the state public defender.

“(b) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent any party from renegotiating any contract, agreement or memorandum of understanding.”

Laws 2020, ch. 122, § 6, provides: “Any rules or regulations pertaining to guardian ad litem program attorneys promulgated by the office of the state public defender under W.S. 14-12-101(c) shall remain in effect until such time that the office of guardian ad litem promulgates rules.”

§ 14-12-102.
Appointment of program to provide guardian ad litem services.

In cases specified in W.S. 14-12-101(a), if the county in which the court is located participates in the program:

The court shall appoint the program to provide services when appointing a guardian ad litem;

The administrator or designee shall assign an attorney to act as guardian ad litem in accordance with the court’s order.

The program shall cooperate with juvenile courts in developing a case appointment system in each participating county for all applicable cases requiring the appointment of a guardian ad litem.

An attorney accepting a guardian ad litem assignment under the program shall be employed by or contract with the program to provide services in accordance with program requirements. The contract shall specify the fees to be paid for the assignment, which may be a defined hourly or per case rate or a defined sum. Fees paid by the program may vary based upon the type and difficulty of the case, location, work required and experience.

History.

Laws 2012, ch. 76, § 2.

Editor’s notes. —

Laws 2020, ch. 122, § 4, provides: “(a) On the effective date of this act:

“(i) All unexpired contracts existing between the office of the state public defender and attorneys under W.S. 14-12-101(a) or 14-12-102(c) shall continue with the office of guardian ad litem substituted for the office of the state public defender;

“(ii) All unexpired agreements existing between the office of the state public defender and counties under W.S.

14-12-103

shall continue with the office of guardian ad litem substituted for the office of the state public defender;

“(iii) Any unexpired memorandum of understanding existing between the office of the state public defender and the department of family services shall continue with the office of guardian ad litem substituted for the office of the state public defender.

“(b) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent any party from renegotiating any contract, agreement or memorandum of understanding.”

§ 14-12-103.
County participation; reimbursement; offices and equipment.

The office of guardian ad litem shall enter into agreements with each county participating in the program. Agreements shall require counties to comply with all program rules and policies. The agreement shall establish the compensation rate within the county for attorneys providing legal representation as guardians ad litem in program cases and the reimbursement requirements. A county may agree with an attorney providing services under the program to pay a rate in excess of the rate set for payment by the program. If a county agrees to do so, it shall enter into a separate contract with the attorney providing services and shall be responsible and obligated to reimburse the program for one hundred percent (100%) of the excess amount. The county shall enter into a separate agreement with the office setting out the agreement, the excess rate and the responsibilities and obligations of all parties.

The program shall pay from the guardian ad litem account one hundred percent (100%) of the fees for the legal representation of children by attorneys as guardians ad litem in program cases. Participating counties shall reimburse the program an amount equal to not less than twenty-five percent (25%) of the agreed program fees, not less than twenty-five percent (25%) of the program’s administrative cost prorated by program funds expended in each county and one hundred percent (100%) of excess rate fees. The program shall invoice the county for its proportionate share. In the event a county does not make payments within ninety (90) days, the state treasurer may deduct the amount from sales tax revenues due to the county from the state and shall credit the amount to the program account.

There is created a guardian ad litem account. All reimbursements received under the program shall be deposited to the account. Funds within the account are continuously appropriated to the office of guardian ad litem for expenditure for the sole purpose of the guardian ad litem program.

Agreements entered into under this section shall include provision for each county, in which guardians ad litem employed by or under contract with the program are located, to provide adequate space and utility services, other than telephone service, for the use of the program’s guardians ad litem. If suitable office space for all guardians ad litem cannot be provided, the county shall provide, based upon a proportional share, a monthly stipend to all program guardians ad litem housed in private facilities. The proportional share shall be determined by the program, based upon the counties served by each guardian ad litem not provided suitable office space. The stipend shall be paid directly by the county to the program guardian ad litem.

A county which does not participate in the program, shall be responsible for the full cost of guardians ad litem legal fees as provided by W.S. 14-2-318(b)(i), 14-3-434(b)(vi), 14-6-235(b)(vi) and 14-6-434(b)(vi).

The office shall enter into a memorandum of understanding with the department of family services under which a guardian ad litem will be provided for cases in which the department is required by law or court order to provide guardian ad litem services in any of the cases or actions specified in W.S. 14-12-101(a). The department shall reimburse the program an amount equal to not less than twenty-five percent (25%) of the agreed program fees paid to guardians ad litem in actions under this subsection.

History.

Laws 2012, ch. 76, § 2; 2020 ch. 122, § 2, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (a) substituted “office of guardian ad litem” for “office of the state public defender”; in (c) substituted “office of guardian ad litem” for “public defender's office”; and in (d) substituted “provide adequate space” for “provide separate from any public defender field office, adequate space.”

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2020, ch. 122, § 4, provides: “(a) On the effective date of this act:

“(i) All unexpired contracts existing between the office of the state public defender and attorneys under W.S. 14-12-101(a) or 14-12-102(c) shall continue with the office of guardian ad litem substituted for the office of the state public defender;

“(ii) All unexpired agreements existing between the office of the state public defender and counties under W.S.

14-12-103

shall continue with the office of guardian ad litem substituted for the office of the state public defender;

“(iii) Any unexpired memorandum of understanding existing between the office of the state public defender and the department of family services shall continue with the office of guardian ad litem substituted for the office of the state public defender.

“(b) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent any party from renegotiating any contract, agreement or memorandum of understanding.”

§ 14-12-104.
Applicability of the Wyoming Governmental Claims Act and state self-insurance program.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, any attorney providing services for the office pursuant to the guardian ad litem program shall, for matters arising out of such services, be considered a state employee for purposes of coverage and representation under the Wyoming Governmental Claims Act, W.S.

1-39-101

through

1-39-120

, and the state self-insurance program, W.S.

1-41-101

through

1-41-111

.

History.

Laws 2012, ch. 76, § 2; 2017 ch. 41, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, substituted “1-39-120” for “1-39-121.”